Maine, session 132, LD1021.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17806, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. NN, §1,
is further amended to read:
A. Except as provided in paragraphs A‑1, A‑2 and, A‑3 and A-4, whenever there is a
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index from July 1st to June 30th, the board
shall automatically make an equal percentage increase in retirement benefits, beginning
in September, up to a maximum annual increase of 3%. Effective July 1, 2011, the
increase applies to that portion of the retirement benefit up to $20,000, which amount
must be indexed in subsequent years by the same percentage adjustments granted under
this section. Effective July 1, 2022, the increase applies to that portion of the retirement
benefit up to $24,186.25, which amount must be indexed in subsequent years by the
same percentage adjustments granted under this section.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §17806, sub-§1, ¶A-4 is enacted to read:
A-4. Beginning in 2025, whenever there is a percentage increase in the Consumer Price
Index from July 1st to June 30th, the board shall automatically make an equal
percentage increase in retirement benefits, beginning in September, up to a maximum
annual increase of 3% for retirement benefits paid to individuals who are 65 years of
age or older and who qualify for a service retirement benefit for one of the following
positions:
(1) A game warden, game warden investigator, game warden pilot and game
warden specialist in the employment of the Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife;
(2) A marine patrol officer and marine patrol specialist in the employment of the
Department of Marine Resources;
(3) A correctional detective and corrections resource coordinator of the
Department of Corrections employed in a correctional facility, as defined in Title
34-A, section 1001, subsection 6, or whose duties involve contact with prisoners,
probationers, parolees or juvenile offenders;
(4) A state fire marshal investigator and a state fire marshal senior investigator in
the Department of Public Safety;
Page 1 - 132LR1355(01)

(5) A detective in the employment of the office of investigations within the
Department of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor Vehicles;
(6) A Baxter Park Ranger I in the employment of the Baxter State Park Authority;
(7) A deputy judicial marshal, corporal judicial marshal and sergeant judicial
marshal as defined in Title 25, section 2801-A, subsection 2-A;
(8) A detective in the employment of the Office of the Attorney General;
(9) A capitol police officer in the employment of the Department of Public Safety;
(10) A Forest Ranger I, Forest Ranger II, Forest Ranger III and Ranger Pilot in the
employment of the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry;
(11) A probation officer in the employment of the Department of Corrections;
(12) A juvenile community corrections officer in the employment of the
Department of Corrections; and
(13) A military security police officer in the employment of the Department of
Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.